District of Columbia statutes.
8-1825.09

Rules; enforcement.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter. The rules may establish fees necessary to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The Mayor may enforce this subchapter by use of any injunctive relief, measure, or combination of measures, authorized by this subchapter or otherwise by law.

(c)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for a violation of this subchapter or rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.] (“Civil Infractions Act”).

(d)

Repealed.

(e)

The Mayor may require reimbursement for the District’s costs resulting from services, including inspections, testing, storage, and transportation of hives or bees, or other reasonable costs or fees incurred in implementation of this subchapter or regulations promulgated pursuant to this subchapter.

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 219, 60 DCR 1300
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 411(h), 61 DCR 8045
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-142 added the last sentence in (a); repealed (d); and added (e).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(h) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that § 411 of the act shall apply as of December 17, 2014.